District of Columbia statutes.
16-2371

Definitions.

For the purpose of this subchapter, the term “advocate” means a court-appointed special advocate and the term “program” means the court-appointed special advocate program established under this subchapter.

Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-228, § 2(b), 42 DCR 7
1981 Ed., § 16-2371.